Tennessee statutes. Title 63 Professions Of The Healing Arts
Part 2

Medical Practitioners Practicing in Free Health Clinics

63-1-201. Part definitions.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Free health clinic” means a health care facility operated by a nonprofit private entity that does not receive payment for its services and does not impose any charges on the individuals to whom services are rendered;

“Medical practitioner” means a:

Physician licensed under chapter 6 or 9 of this title;

Dentist or dental hygienist licensed under chapter 5 of this title;

Nurse licensed under chapter 7 of this title;

Chiropractor licensed under chapter 4 of this title;

Psychologist licensed under chapter 11 of this title;

Social worker licensed under chapter 23 of this title; and

Physician assistant licensed under chapter 19 of this title; and

“Special volunteer license” means a license awarded to a medical practitioner whose sole practice is rendering professional services without remuneration in a free health clinic at a specified site or setting. The practitioner must have been previously issued a license to practice in this state or another state and the practitioner must never have been the subject of disciplinary action. The licensing authority shall require an application and relevant documentation before issuing the special volunteer license. No fee may be charged for an application or issuance of the special license.

Acts 2004, ch. 579, § 1.

63-1-202. Exemption from fees and taxes.

Medical practitioners who practice in a free health clinic and who do not receive monetary remuneration for medical care and other services rendered within the statutory scope of practice for such practitioner shall not be subject to:

Any fees for a special volunteer license from the practitioner's licensing board; or

The privilege tax on occupations imposed by title 67, chapter 4, part 17.

Acts 2004, ch. 579, § 1.

63-1-203. Compensation for services prohibited — Donations and gifts permitted.

A medical practitioner or a free health clinic may not receive any compensation for services rendered including, but not limited to, reimbursement from an individual or from any third party payor. Reimbursement may not be accepted from any insurance policy, health plan or federal or state benefits program. A clinic may receive donations and gifts.

Acts 2004, ch. 579, § 1.